District of Columbia statutes.
31-1505

Examination authority.

The acts of the managing general agent are considered to be the acts of the insurer on whose behalf it is acting. A managing general agent may be examined as if it were the insurer.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-41, § 6, 40 DCR 6014
1981 Ed., § 35-3005.